Maryland, session 2026, HB1052.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
8–3A–04.
(a) There is a Maryland School for the Deaf.
(b) The governance of the Maryland School for the Deaf is vested in the Board of
Trustees of the Maryland School for the Deaf.
(c) (1) The Board of Trustees shall consist of [19] 13 members appointed by
the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.
(2) Of the [19] 13 members, at least [6] 7 members shall be deaf.
(3) Each member of the Board shall:
(i) Be a resident of the State;
(ii) Be a member of the general public; and
– 1 –

Ch. 721 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) Have demonstrated an active interest in the education of deaf
children.
(4) Each geographic region of the State shall be represented by at least one
member of the Board.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The terms of the first 6 appointed members of the Board of Trustees of the
Maryland School for the Deaf whose terms expire after the effective date of this Act shall
terminate at the end of the last day of each respective term.
(b) On the termination of an appointed member in accordance with subsection (a)
of this section, the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall prioritize
appointing members who are deaf in accordance with § 8–3A–04(c)(2) of the Education
Article as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –